Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF367.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; STUDY.new text end new text begin (a) $1,500,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of transportation to study options for the following intersections in the city of Rockville: new text end new text begin (1) marked Trunk Highway 23 and Stearns County State-Aid Highway 47; new text end new text begin (2) marked Trunk Highway 23 and Stearns County State-Aid Highway 82; and new text end new text begin (3) marked Trunk Highway 23 and Stearns County Road 140. new text end new text begin (b) The study must determine if an underpass, overpass, or tunnel is the best option for improving the safety of each intersection. The study must not consider a J-turn as an option. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end